Hawaii statutes.
§577-15 Children deemed to be orphans.
For the purpose of taking, or determining eligibility to take, any benefit
under any law or under any private instrument by the terms of which orphans are
eligible to receive benefits, a child born of parents not married to each other
and not adopted shall be deemed an orphan; provided that nothing in this
section shall be construed (1) to deprive any such child of any rights of
inheritance, or to support, or any other rights, to which the child would be
entitled, or (2) to affect the liabilities of any other person with respect to
any such child to which the person would be subject, if this section had not
been enacted. [L 1941, c 263, §1; RL 1945, §12281; RL 1955, §330-13; HRS
§577-15; am L 1975, c 77, §1(4)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next